Utah statutes.
57-1-37.   Failure to disclose not a basis for liability.

(1)  The failure of an owner of real property to disclose that the property being offered for sale is stigmatized is not a material fact that must be disclosed in the transaction of real property.

(2)  Neither an owner nor his agent is liable for failing to disclose that the property is stigmatized.

